dicts/hu_HU-comb/hu_HU.aff
SFX C 0 déiért [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déivé [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déivel [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déitől [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déit [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déiről [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déire [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déinél [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déinek [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déin [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déiig [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déihöz [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déig [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déiből [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déiben [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déibe [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déi [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déhöz [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 déből [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dében [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 débe [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dé [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dtől [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dről [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dre [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dnél [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dnek [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dként [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dkor [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dig [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dhöz [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 det [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 ddé [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 ddel [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dből [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dben [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 dbe [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
SFX C 0 d [áéiíoóőuúüűy-]
